Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.180

Outpatient services—Authorized—Defined.

A nursing home may, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the department of social and health services, offer outpatient services to persons who are not otherwise patients at such nursing home. Any certified nursing home offering outpatient services may receive payments from the federal medicare program for such services as are permissible under that program.

Outpatient services may include any health or social care needs, except surgery, that could feasibly be offered on an outpatient basis.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 71 s 1.]